Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 22. Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995.

§§ 56-556 through 56-575.

Repealed by Acts 2014, c. 805, cl. 11, effective October 1, 2014.

Cross references.

For current provisions of the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995, see §

33.2-1800

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Where appropriate, annotations and historical citations from former sections have been added to current sections. For complete table of comparative sections, see Volume 10, Code of Virginia.